District of Columbia statutes.
47-876

Costs for records and data; miscellaneous charges.

The Mayor may establish and collect costs related to the compilation and production of records, data, and maps in electronic media or tangible formats. The Mayor may also establish and collect charges, including royalties, pursuant to a contract, for goods and services and the licensing of intellectual property rights. Costs and charges collected under this section shall be deposited into the Recorder of Deeds Automation and Infrastructure Improvement Fund under § 42-1214.

History

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(m), 50 DCR 896

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-1214.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(m) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).